Illinois, session 104th, SB1077.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Sales Finance Agency Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (205 ILCS 660/1)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5201)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8Sales Finance Agency Act.9(Source: Laws 1967, p. 2062.)